Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2

Registration of Companies

45-5-201. General qualifications for registration.

In order to qualify for registration as an industrial loan and thrift company, a person must:

Demonstrate experience, character and general fitness to command the confidence of the public and warrant the belief that the business to be operated will be operated lawfully and fairly;

If a natural person or a partnership, have a net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each office or place of business to be registered;

If a corporation, be either:

Organized under the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27, to transact business as an industrial loan and thrift company; or

Organized and existing under the laws of some other jurisdiction, holding a certificate of authority to transact business in this state from the secretary of state under the Tennessee Business Corporation Act and authorized to transact business as an industrial loan and thrift company or to engage in a similar business in the jurisdiction of its incorporation; and

Whether foreign or domestic, have a total stated capital and surplus of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each certificate of registration.

In order to qualify for registration as an industrial investment company or industrial bank, a person must:

Demonstrate experience, character and general fitness as to command the confidence of the public and warrant the belief that the business to be operated will be operated lawfully and fairly;

Have a capital structure in accordance with § 45-5-603;

Be organized under the Tennessee Business Corporation Act to transact business as an industrial bank or industrial investment company, as the case may be;

Have a name that does not include the word “bank” or any word deceptively similar thereto; and

Comply with the requirements of part 6 of this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 4; T.C.A., § 45-2004; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 13; 1994, ch. 551, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

The Tennessee General Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, ch. 1, was repealed effective January 1, 1988. New provisions concerning business corporations may be found in title 48, chs. 11-27.

45-5-202. Procedures for registration.

In order to obtain a certificate of registration, a person must file an application with the commissioner on forms approved and furnished by the commissioner, giving the information that the commissioner may reasonably require in order to determine the qualifications of the applicant, including, but not limited to, identification of all persons owning an interest in the applicant and addresses of any affiliated lenders in this state.

Upon the filing of an application and payment by the applicant of a nonrefundable supervision fee, as provided in § 45-1-118(i), the commissioner shall investigate the facts concerning the application and the information contained in the application. If the commissioner finds that the applicant meets the qualifications specified in this chapter for registration, the commissioner shall approve the application.

At the time of the filing of an application for a certificate of registration, each applicant that makes or proposes to make residential mortgage loans shall file with the commissioner a surety bond payable to the state, in a form to be approved by the commissioner, for the benefit of any person injured by the wrongful act, default, fraud or misrepresentation of the registrant. The surety bond shall provide coverage for each mortgage loan originator in an amount that reflects the dollar amount of residential mortgage loans originated by the registrant, as determined by the commissioner; provided, that, for the first period of registration during which the company makes or proposes to make residential mortgage loans, or for the 2009-2010 registration period, or both, as applicable, the surety bond shall be in the amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). Only one (1) bond is required for the registrant, regardless of the number of offices. Immediately upon recovery upon any action on the bond, the registrant shall file a new bond. The bond shall be maintained by the registrant for not less than twenty-four (24) months following the expiration, revocation, suspension or surrender of the certificate of registration. A registrant that has obtained registration under subsection (d) shall first comply with the surety bond requirements of this subsection (c) prior to making or proposing to make a residential mortgage loan. A registrant authorized to make residential mortgage loans on July 1, 2009, and holding a letter of credit, as opposed to a surety bond, shall be required to comply with the surety bond requirements of this subsection (c) in order to renew the registrant’s registration in 2010.

All other applicants shall, at the time of the filing of an application for a certificate of registration, file with the commissioner a surety bond payable to the state or a letter of credit, in each case in a form to be approved by the commissioner, for the benefit of any person injured by the wrongful act, default, fraud or misrepresentation of the registrant or the registrant's employees, or both, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Only one (1) bond or letter of credit is required, regardless of the number of offices of the registrant. The bond or letter of credit shall be maintained by the registrant for not less than twenty-four (24) months following the expiration, revocation, suspension or surrender of the certificate of registration.

As a condition of registration for applicants that propose to make residential mortgage loans, or as a condition of a registrant later obtaining such authority, the commissioner may adopt rules to require that certain individuals associated with the applicant or registrant successfully complete testing or educational courses, or both, approved by the commissioner. The rules may extend to any individual who is an officer, partner, managing member or controlling person, or to any other individual associated with the applicant or registrant as is reasonably necessary to meet the purposes of this chapter.

The commissioner may require education and testing providers of any of the educational courses or tests required under this chapter to file information regarding the contents and materials of the proposed courses or tests with the commissioner for review and approval. The commissioner may set fees for the initial and continuing review of courses and tests.

The commissioner is authorized to require an applicant for a certificate of registration to consent to a criminal history records check and to provide with the application fingerprints in a form acceptable to the commissioner. The commissioner may require such consent and fingerprints from any individual who is an officer, partner, managing member or ultimate equitable owner of ten percent (10%) or more of the applicant, as well as from any other individual associated with the applicant as is reasonably necessary to meet the purposes of this chapter. Refusal of any person to consent to a criminal history records check or to provide fingerprints as allowed by this section constitutes grounds for the commissioner to deny registration to the applicant.

Any criminal history records check conducted under subsection (g) shall be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, or both, and the results of the criminal history records check shall be forwarded to the commissioner. All costs incurred in conducting the criminal history records check shall be paid by the applicant, in addition to any other fees required by this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the commissioner shall not use a multi-state automated licensing system to share federal bureau of investigation criminal history background information of any individual other than mortgage loan originators, unless authorized to do so by the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (12 U.S.C. §§ 5101-5116), as amended, or other federal law.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 5; T.C.A., § 45-2005; Acts 2001, ch. 165, §§ 3, 4; 2009, ch. 499, §§ 3, 4; 2014, ch. 736, §§ 2, 3; 2016, ch. 745, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

45-5-203. Expiration of registration certificates — Renewal — Fees — Evidence that surety bond adjusted — Continuing education and testing — Biennial registration.

A certificate of registration issued pursuant to this chapter expires on December 31. A certificate of registration may be renewed for the ensuing twelve-month period upon application by the registrant showing continued compliance with the requirements of § 45-5-201 and payment of the nonrefundable supervision fee, as provided in § 45-1-118(i). A registrant making timely and complete application and payment for renewal of its certificate of registration may continue to operate under its existing certificate of registration until its application is approved or denied. The completed renewal application and the payment of the annual supervision fee must be sent to the department on or before December 31, but no earlier than November 1, of each year.

A registrant submitting an application for renewal of a certificate of registration expiring on March 31, 2018, must pay the supervision fee as provided in § 45-1-118(i). The completed renewal application and payment must be sent to the department on or before March 1, 2018. A renewal certificate of registration with a beginning effective date of April 1, 2018, expires on December 31, 2018.

As a condition of renewal of a certificate of registration for a registrant that makes or proposes to make residential mortgage loans, the registrant shall file with its renewal application evidence that its surety bond is adjusted in accordance with § 45-5-202(c).

As a condition of renewal of a certificate of registration for a registrant that makes or proposes to make residential mortgage loans, the commissioner may adopt rules to require that any of the individuals identified pursuant to § 45-5-202(e) successfully complete continuing education course requirements. The rules pertaining to continuing education requirements, as well as those pertaining to any testing or education requirements, or both, under § 45-5-202, may include criteria for content, accreditation of sponsors and programs, computation of credit, special cases and exemptions, general compliance procedures and sanctions for noncompliance.

The commissioner may establish a biennial registration arrangement for the filing of the application for renewal of the certificate of registration, but in no case shall the supervision fee be payable for more than one (1) year at a time.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-2006; Acts 1984, ch. 698, § 2; 2001, ch. 165, § 5; 2009, ch. 499, § 5; 2014, ch. 736, § 4; 2017, ch. 122, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Acts 1984, ch. 698, § 3, provided that the provisions of the 1984 amendment by that act were declared to be remedial in nature to be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

45-5-204. Denial of applications for registration.

If the commissioner determines that an applicant is not qualified to receive a certificate of registration, the commissioner shall notify the applicant in writing that the application has been denied, stating the basis for denial.

If the commissioner denies an application, or if the commissioner fails to act on an application within ninety (90) days after its filing, the applicant may make written demand to the commissioner for a hearing before the commissioner on the question of whether the certificate of registration should be granted.

The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. In the hearing, the burden of proving that the applicant is entitled to a certificate of registration shall be on the applicant. Decisions of the commissioner on the hearings shall be subject to review under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 7; T.C.A., § 45-2007.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

45-5-205. Suspension or revocation of certificates of registration.

The commissioner may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, suspend or revoke any certificate of registration if the commissioner finds that the registrant has knowingly or without exercising due care:

Failed to pay any fees or assessments imposed by the commissioner under the authority of this chapter; or

Violated any provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation issued under this chapter.

A hearing shall be held on twenty (20) days' notice, in writing, setting forth the time and place and a concise statement of the facts alleged to sustain a suspension or revocation, which hearing shall be full, fair and public. The suspension or revocation and its effective date shall be set forth in a written order accompanied by conclusions of law, findings of fact and the reasons for the suspension or revocation, and a copy shall forthwith be delivered to the registrant. The order, findings, conclusions and any transcript of the evidence considered by the commissioner shall be filed with the public records of the department of financial institutions.

If a registrant operates more than one (1) office, any suspension or revocation of its certificate of registration shall be directed only against the office or offices that the commissioner may find in violation of this chapter.

Suspension or revocation of a certificate of registration shall not affect the validity of any existing loan contracts made under this chapter, or the validity of any investment certificates or thrift certificates issued in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 19; T.C.A., § 45-2019; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 14; 2001, ch. 165, § 6; 2014, ch. 736, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

45-5-206. Lost certificates of registration — Substitutions.

In the event that a certificate of registration issued under this chapter is lost or destroyed, the person to whom the certificate of registration was issued may, upon payment of a fee prescribed by the commissioner, obtain a substitute certificate of registration, upon furnishing proof satisfactory to the commissioner that the certificate of registration has become lost or destroyed.

Acts 2004, ch. 747, § 11.

45-5-207. License requirement — Sponsorship — Registrant subject to all applicable requirements and prohibitions of chapter 13 of this title — Violations — Submission of reports to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

Effective July 31, 2009, no registrant shall make a residential mortgage loan unless each individual that acts as a mortgage loan originator with respect to the loan has obtained a mortgage loan originator license under chapter 13, part 3 of this title, and has been sponsored by the registrant in accordance with subsection (b), except as follows:

A registrant authorized to make residential mortgage loans on July 30, 2009, is authorized to continue doing so after July 30, 2009; provided, that each individual who acts as a mortgage loan originator with respect to any residential mortgage loan is registered with the commissioner in affiliation with that registrant on or before July 30, 2009. The excepted authority shall only continue for so long as the mortgage loan originator registration remains effective;

To register a mortgage loan originator under subdivision (a)(1), the registrant must timely submit to the commissioner a nonrefundable registration fee of one hundred dollars ($100) and a completed registration form containing any information the commissioner deems necessary, including the following:

The name of the registrant for whom the mortgage loan originator provides origination services;

The mortgage loan originator's name, birth date, social security number and address; and

The office location where the mortgage loan originator will engage in residential mortgage loan origination services;

Any mortgage loan originator timely registered with a registrant shall be considered sponsored by that registrant for purposes of subsection (b) for the term of the registration and any successive licensure;

The registration of a mortgage loan originator under this section shall expire without further notice or process upon either of the following occurrences:

If the mortgage loan originator ceases providing services for the affiliated registrant at the office listed in the registration form; or

On December 31, 2009, unless between November 1, 2009, and December 31, 2009, the individual files an application through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for a mortgage loan originator license under chapter 13, part 3 of this title, pays all licensing fees and submits fingerprints for a criminal background check. If this is timely accomplished, the registration shall remain effective until such time as the commissioner acts on the licensure application, but in no event shall the registration be valid after July 30, 2010. If the licensure application is approved, the license shall be issued for calendar year 2010; and

An individual registered as a mortgage loan originator under this subsection (a) shall not be in violation of any law requiring a license to act as a mortgage loan originator for any origination services performed while the registration is effective.

To sponsor a mortgage loan originator on or after July 31, 2009, a registrant must file the form with the commissioner as the commissioner prescribes and pay to the commissioner a nonrefundable sponsorship fee of one hundred dollars ($100), which fee may be decreased or increased by rule of the commissioner. Upon determining that the individual has obtained a license under chapter 13, part 3 of this title and is not sponsored by any other registrant, mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker, the commissioner shall authorize the sponsorship. A mortgage loan originator sponsorship terminates if the sponsoring registrant's authority to make residential mortgage loans expires or is revoked or otherwise terminates, or if the mortgage loan originator ceases providing services for the registrant. A mortgage loan originator sponsorship does not terminate if the mortgage loan originator changes from one (1) office of the sponsoring registrant to another registered office of the same company. Upon any change in the mortgage loan originator's office, the sponsoring registrant shall notify the commissioner in writing within fourteen (14) days of the change.

Should a mortgage loan originator sponsorship terminate, the mortgage loan originator's license shall become inactive, but shall not expire so long as the mortgage loan originator continues to meet all other requirements for licensure and renewal of licensure. An inactive license is reactivated if the mortgage loan originator obtains a new sponsorship under this section or under chapter 13, part 3 of this title. The commissioner may not approve a new sponsorship unless and until the commissioner has been notified that any prior sponsorship has terminated.

The sponsoring registrant shall ensure that each application for a residential mortgage loan contains the name and registration number of the registrant, as well as the name, signature and license number of the mortgage loan originator who provided origination services with respect to the loan. The registrant shall also ensure that the registrant's records pertaining to the residential mortgage loan contain the unique identifier, if different from the license number, of each mortgage loan originator that provided services with respect to the loan.

The sponsoring registrant is responsible for and shall supervise the acts of each sponsored mortgage loan originator.

A mortgage loan originator of a registrant is subject to all applicable requirements and prohibitions of chapter 13 of this title, unless otherwise stated in chapter 13 of this title.

A registrant that is authorized to make residential mortgage loans is subject to investigation and examination under chapter 13 of this title, to the extent that chapter 13 of this title provides the commissioner greater or different investigatory or examination power than is authorized under this chapter.

It is a violation of this chapter for a registrant to commit any of the acts or practices prohibited by § 45-13-401 in the making of a residential mortgage loan, as applicable.

A registrant that is authorized to make residential mortgage loans shall, pursuant to order or direction of the commissioner, submit reports of condition to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry pertaining to its residential mortgage loan business, which shall be in the form and shall contain the information that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry requires.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 6.

45-5-208. Multi-state automated licensing system.

In addition to any other powers imposed upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner is authorized to require persons subject to this chapter to be registered through a multi-state automated licensing system. Pursuant to this authority, the commissioner may:

Promulgate any rules reasonably necessary for participation in, transition to, or operation of a multi-state automated licensing system;

Establish relationships or enter into agreements reasonably necessary for participation in, transition to, or operation of a multi-state automated licensing system. The agreements may include, but are not limited to, operating agreements, information sharing agreements, interstate cooperative agreements, and technology licensing agreements;

Require that applications for registration under this chapter and renewals of such registrations be filed with a multi-state automated licensing system;

Require that any fees required to be paid under this chapter be paid through a multi-state automated licensing system;

Establish deadlines for transitioning registrations to a multi-state automated licensing system. The commissioner may deny any applications or renewal applications not filed with a multi-state automated licensing system after the deadlines have passed, notwithstanding any other deadlines established elsewhere in this chapter. The commissioner shall provide reasonable notice of any transition deadlines to registrants; and

Take such further actions as are reasonably necessary to give effect to this section.

Nothing in this section authorizes the commissioner to require a person who is not subject to this chapter to submit information to, or participate in, a multi-state automated licensing system.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commissioner retains full authority and discretion to register persons under this chapter and to enforce this chapter. Nothing in this section reduces or derogates that authority and discretion.

Applicants for and holders of registrations issued under this chapter must pay all costs associated with submitting an application or transitioning a registration to a multi-state automated licensing system, as well as all costs associated with maintaining and renewing any registration issued by the commissioner on a multi-state automated licensing system.

Acts 2017, ch. 122, § 4.

45-5-209. Privacy or confidentiality of shared information.

In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:

The requirements under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to a multi-state automated licensing system, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, continue to apply to the information or material after it has been disclosed to a multi-state automated licensing system. The information or material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with consumer finance industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law, including the protection available under § 45-1-120;

For purposes of subdivision (1), the commissioner may enter into agreements or sharing agreements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, or other associations representing governmental agencies, as established by rule, regulation, or order of the commissioner;

Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality protection under subdivision (1) is not subject to:

Disclosure under any federal or state law governing disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or agency of the federal government or the respective state; or

Subpoena or discovery or admission into evidence in any private civil action or administrative process, unless the person to whom such information or material pertains, in the person's discretion, waives any applicable privilege held by a multi-state automated licensing system, in whole or in part;

This section supersedes any inconsistent provisions of title 10, chapter 7, part 5, pertaining to the records open to public inspection; and

This section does not apply to information or material relating to publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against persons subject to this chapter that is included in a multi-state automated licensing system for access by the public.

Acts 2017, ch. 122, § 4.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.